Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-263
Resurvey of school lands; Morrill County; acceptance.

The resurvey made by the United States Government of school sections sixteen and thirty-six, in townships twenty-one, twenty-two and twenty-three north, of range forty-seven, west of the sixth principal meridian, in Morrill County, Nebraska, and known as tracts numbers sixty-three and sixty-four in township twenty-one; tracts numbers sixty-five and sixty-six in township twenty-two, and tracts numbers seventy-eight and seventy-nine in township twenty-three, which surveys have been approved by the Commissioner of the General Land Office, are accepted and adopted as the true and correct lines, corners, monuments and boundaries of such school sections.

Laws 1929, c. 184, § 1, p. 647;

C.S.1929, § 72-240;

R.S.1943, § 72-263.